Washington statutes.
RCW 35.77.010

Perpetual advanced six-year plans for coordinated transportation program expenditures—Nonmotorized transportation—Railroad right-of-way.

(1) The legislative body of each city and town, pursuant to one or more public hearings thereon, shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive transportation program for the ensuing six calendar years. If the city or town has adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to chapter 35.63 or 35A.63 RCW, the inherent authority of a first-class city derived from its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW, the program shall be consistent with this comprehensive plan. The program shall include any new or enhanced bicycle or pedestrian facilities identified pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(6) or other applicable changes that promote nonmotorized transit.

The program shall be filed with the secretary of transportation not more than thirty days after its adoption. Annually thereafter the legislative body of each city and town shall review the work accomplished under the program and determine current city transportation needs. Based on these findings each such legislative body shall prepare and after public hearings thereon adopt a revised and extended comprehensive transportation program before July 1st of each year, and each one-year extension and revision shall be filed with the secretary of transportation not more than thirty days after its adoption. The purpose of this section is to assure that each city and town shall perpetually have available advanced plans looking to the future for not less than six years as a guide in carrying out a coordinated transportation program. The program may at any time be revised by a majority of the legislative body of a city or town, but only after a public hearing.

The six-year plan for each city or town shall specifically set forth those projects and programs of regional significance for inclusion in the transportation improvement program within that region.

(2) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain information as to how a city or town will expend its moneys, including funds made available pursuant to chapter 47.30 RCW, for nonmotorized transportation purposes.

(3) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain information as to how a city or town shall act to preserve railroad right-of-way in the event the railroad ceases to operate in the city's or town's jurisdiction.

[ 2005 c 360 s 4. Prior: 1994 c 179 s 1; 1994 c 158 s 7; 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 59; 1988 c 167 s 6; 1984 c 7 s 23; 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 215 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 27; 1965 c 7 s 35.77.010; prior: 1961 c 195 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2005 c 360: See note following RCW 36.70A.070.

Captions not law—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 158: See RCW 47.80.902 through 47.80.904.

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.

Savings—Severability—1988 c 167: See notes following RCW 47.26.121.

Effective dates—1977 ex.s. c 317: See note following RCW 82.38.030.

Effective dates—1967 ex.s. c 83: See RCW 47.26.910.

Highways, roads, streets in urban areas, urban arterials, development: Chapter 47.26 RCW.

Long-range arterial construction planning, counties and cities to prepare data: RCW 47.26.170.

Perpetual advanced six-year plans for coordinated transportation program: RCW 36.81.121.

Transportation improvement board: Chapter 47.26 RCW.